Missouri, session 2026, HB1702.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.2540, 226.531, and 573.010, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.2540, 226.531, 573.010, and
573.520, to read as follows:
67.2540. As used in sections 67.2540 to 67.2556, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar establishment in which
persons regularly appear in a state of nudity[, as defined in section 573.500,] or seminudity in
the performance of their duties;
(2) "Adult cabaret performance", a performance that appeals to a prurient
interest in a location other than an adult cabaret that features topless dancers, go-go
dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators who provide
entertainment, or similar entertainers, regardless of whether performed for
consideration;
(3) "Employee", a person who is at least twenty-one years of age and who performs
any service on the premises of a sexually oriented business on a full-time, part-time, or
contract basis, whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent
contractor, agent, or otherwise, and whether or not said person is paid a salary, wage, or other
compensation by the operator of said business. The term employee does not include a person
exclusively on the premises for repair or maintenance of the premises or equipment on the
premises, or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1702 2
[(3)] (4) "Nudity" or a "state of nudity", the showing of the human male or female
genitals, pubic area, vulva, anus, anal cleft or anal cleavage with less than a fully opaque
covering, the showing of the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any part
of the nipple, or the showing of the covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state;
[(4)] (5) "Nuisance", any place in or upon which lewdness, assignation, or
prostitution is conducted, permitted, continued, or exists, or any place, in or upon which lewd,
indecent, lascivious, or obscene films, or films designed to be projected for exhibition, are
photographed, manufactured, developed, screened, exhibited, or otherwise prepared or
shown, and the personal property and contents used in conducting and maintaining any such
place for any such purpose. The provisions of this section shall not affect any newspaper,
magazine, or other publication entered as second class matter by the post office department;
[(5)] (6) "Person", an individual, proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association,
or other legal entity;
[(6)] (7) "Seminude" or in a "seminude condition", a state of dress in which opaque
clothing fails to cover the genitals, anus, anal cleft or cleavage, pubic area, vulva, nipple and
areola of the female breast below a horizontal line across the top of the areola at its highest
point. Seminudity shall include the entire lower portion of the female breast, but shall not
include any portion of the cleavage of the human female breast exhibited by wearing apparel
provided the areola is not exposed in whole or part;
[(7)] (8) "Sexually oriented business", an adult cabaret [or],any business which offers
its patrons goods of which a substantial or significant portion are sexually oriented material,
or any business other than an adult cabaret that offers an adult cabaret performance. It
shall be presumed that a business that derives thirty percent or less of its revenue from
sexually oriented materials is presumed not to be a sexually oriented business. [No] A
building, premises, structure, or other facility that contains any sexually oriented business
shall not contain any other kind of sexually oriented business, except that of an adult
cabaret performance;
[(8)] (9) "Sexually oriented materials", any pictorial or three-dimensional material, or
film, motion picture, DVD, video cassette, or similar photographic reproduction, that depicts
nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse, as defined in section
573.010;
[(9)] (10) "Specified criminal activity" includes the following offenses:
(a) Prostitution or promotion of prostitution; dissemination of obscenity; sale,
distribution, or display of harmful material to a minor; sexual performance by a child;
possession or distribution of child pornography; public lewdness; indecent exposure;
indecency with a child; engaging in organized criminal activity; sexual assault; molestation of
a child; gambling prohibited under Missouri law; or distribution of a controlled substance; or

HB 1702 3
any similar offenses described in this subdivision under the criminal or penal code of other
states or countries;
(b) For which:
a. Less than two years have elapsed since the date of conviction or the date of release
from confinement imposed for the conviction, whichever is the later date, if the conviction is
of a misdemeanor offense;
b. Less than five years have elapsed since the date of conviction or the date of release
from confinement for the conviction, whichever is the later date, if the conviction is of a
felony offense; or
c. Less than five years have elapsed since the date of the last conviction or the date of
release from confinement for the last conviction, whichever is the later date, if the convictions
are of two or more misdemeanor offenses or combination of misdemeanor offenses occurring
within any twenty-four-month period;
(c) The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall not prevent a sexually oriented
business from being considered a nuisance and closed under section 67.2546;
[(10)] (11) "Specified sexual activities" includes the following acts:
(a) The fondling or other erotic touching of human genitals, pubic region, buttocks,
anus, or female breasts;
(b) Sex acts, actual or simulated, including intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation,
or sodomy; or
(c) Excretory functions as part of or in connection with any of the activities set forth
in this subdivision.
226.531. 1. As used in this section the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar establishment in which
persons appear in a state of nudity, as defined in section [573.500] 573.010, or seminudity, in
the performance of their duties;
(2) "Adult cabaret performance", a performance that appeals to a prurient
interest in a location other than an adult cabaret that features topless dancers, go-go
dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators who provide
entertainment, or similar entertainers, regardless of whether performed for
consideration;
(3) "Seminudity", a state of dress in which opaque clothing fails to cover the genitals,
anus, anal cleft or cleavage, pubic area, vulva, nipple and areola of the female breast below a
horizontal line across the top of the areola at its highest point. Seminudity shall include the
entire lower portion of the female breast, but shall not include any portion of the cleavage of
the human female breast exhibited by wearing apparel provided the areola is not exposed in
whole or part;

HB 1702 4
[(3)] (4) "Sexually oriented business", any business which offers its patrons goods of
which a substantial portion are sexually oriented materials or any business other than an
adult cabaret that offers an adult cabaret performance. Any business where more than
ten percent of display space is used for sexually oriented materials shall be presumed to be a
sexually oriented business;
[(4)] (5) "Sexually oriented materials", any textual, pictorial, or three-dimensional
material that depicts nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse in a
way which is patently offensive to the average person applying contemporary adult
community standards with respect to what is suitable for minors.
2. No billboard or other exterior advertising sign for an adult cabaret or sexually
oriented business shall be located within one mile of any state highway except if such
business is located within one mile of a state highway then the business may display a
maximum of two exterior signs on the premises of the business, consisting of one
identification sign and one sign solely giving notice that the premises are off limits to minors.
The identification sign shall be no more than forty square feet in size and shall include no
more than the following information: name, street address, telephone number, and operating
hours of the business.
3. Signs existing on August 28, 2004, which did not conform to the requirements of
this section, may be allowed to continue as a nonconforming use, but should be made to
conform within three years from August 28, 2004.
4. Any owner of such a business who violates the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class C misdemeanor. Each week a violation of this section continues to exist shall
constitute a separate offense.
5. This section is designed to protect the following public policy interests of this state,
including but not limited to: to mitigate the adverse secondary effects of sexually oriented
businesses, to improve traffic safety, to limit harm to minors, and to reduce prostitution,
crime, juvenile delinquency, deterioration in property values, and lethargy in neighborhood
improvement efforts.
573.010. As used in this chapter the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, juice bar, restaurant, bottle club, or other
commercial establishment, regardless of whether alcoholic beverages are served, which
regularly features persons who appear semi-nude;
(2) "Adult cabaret performance", a performance that appeals to a prurient
interest in a location other than an adult cabaret that features topless dancers, go-go
dancers, exotic dancers, strippers, male or female impersonators who provide
entertainment, or similar entertainers, regardless of whether performed for
consideration;

HB 1702 5
(3) "Characterized by", describing the essential character or dominant theme of an
item;
[(3)] (4) "Child", any person under the age of fourteen;
[(4)] (5) "Child pornography":
(a) Any obscene material or performance depicting sexual conduct, sexual contact as
defined in section 566.010, or a sexual performance and which has as one of its participants or
portrays as an observer of such conduct, contact, or performance a minor; or
(b) Any visual depiction, including any photograph, film, video, picture, or computer
or computer-generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic,
mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit conduct where:
a. The production of such visual depiction involves the use of a minor engaging in
sexually explicit conduct;
b. Such visual depiction is a digital image, computer image, or computer-generated
image that is, or is indistinguishable from, that of a minor engaging in sexually explicit
conduct, in that the depiction is such that an ordinary person viewing the depiction would
conclude that the depiction is of an actual minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct; or
c. Such visual depiction has been created, adapted, or modified to show that an
identifiable minor is engaging in sexually explicit conduct. "Identifiable minor" means a
person who was a minor at the time the visual depiction was created, adapted, or modified; or
whose image as a minor was used in creating, adapting, or modifying the visual depiction;
and who is recognizable as an actual person by the person's face, likeness, or other
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature. The
term identifiable minor shall not be construed to require proof of the actual identity of the
identifiable minor;
[(5)] (6) "Employ", "employee", or "employment", any person who performs any
service on the premises of a sexually oriented business, on a full-time, part-time, or contract
basis, whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent contractor, agent,
or otherwise. Employee does not include a person exclusively on the premises for repair or
maintenance of the premises or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
[(6)] (7) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial or three-dimensional material
depicting human masturbation, deviate sexual intercourse, sexual intercourse, direct physical
stimulation or unclothed genitals, sadomasochistic abuse, or emphasizing the depiction of
postpubertal human genitals; provided, however, that works of art or of anthropological
significance shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition;
[(7)] (8) "Furnish", to issue, sell, give, provide, lend, mail, deliver, transfer, circulate,
disseminate, present, exhibit or otherwise provide;

HB 1702 6
[(8)] (9) "Material", anything printed or written, or any picture, drawing, photograph,
motion picture film, videotape or videotape production, or pictorial representation, or any
recording or transcription, or any mechanical, chemical, or electrical reproduction, or stored
computer data, or anything which is or may be used as a means of communication. Material
includes undeveloped photographs, molds, printing plates, stored computer data and other
latent representational objects;
[(9)] (10) "Minor", any person less than eighteen years of age;
[(10)] (11) "Nudity" or "state of nudity", the showing of the human genitals, pubic
area, vulva, anus, anal cleft, or the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any
part of the nipple or areola;
[(11)] (12) "Obscene", any material or performance if, taken as a whole:
(a) Applying contemporary community standards, its predominant appeal is to
prurient interest in sex; and
(b) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find the
material depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and
(c) A reasonable person would find the material lacks serious literary, artistic,
political or scientific value;
[(12)] (13) "Operator", any person on the premises of a sexually oriented business
who causes the business to function, puts or keeps the business in operation, or is authorized
to manage the business or exercise overall operational control of the business premises. A
person may be found to be operating or causing to be operated a sexually oriented business
whether or not such person is an owner, part owner, or licensee of the business;
[(13)] (14) "Performance", any play, motion picture film, videotape, dance or
exhibition performed before an audience of one or more;
[(14)] (15) "Pornographic for minors", any material or performance if the following
apply:
(a) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find
that the material or performance, taken as a whole, has a tendency to cater or appeal to a
prurient interest of minors; and
(b) The material or performance depicts or describes nudity, sexual conduct, the
condition of human genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal, or
sadomasochistic abuse in a way which is patently offensive to the average person applying
contemporary adult community standards with respect to what is suitable for minors; and
(c) The material or performance, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic,
political, or scientific value for minors;
[(15)] (16) "Premises", the real property upon which a sexually oriented business is
located, and all appurtenances thereto and buildings thereon, including but not limited to the

HB 1702 7
sexually oriented business, the grounds, private walkways, and parking lots or parking
garages or both;
[(16)] (17) "Promote", to manufacture, issue, sell, provide, mail, deliver, transfer,
transmute, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, or advertise, or to offer
or agree to do the same, by any means including a computer;
[(17)] (18) "Regularly", the consistent and repeated doing of the act so described;
[(18)] (19) "Sadomasochistic abuse", flagellation or torture by or upon a person as an
act of sexual stimulation or gratification;
[(19)] (20) "Semi-nude" or "state of semi-nudity", the showing of the female breast
below a horizontal line across the top of the areola and extending across the width of the
breast at such point, or the showing of the male or female buttocks. Such definition includes
the lower portion of the human female breast, but shall not include any portion of the
cleavage of the female breasts exhibited by a bikini, dress, blouse, shirt, leotard, or similar
wearing apparel provided the areola is not exposed in whole or in part;
[(20)] (21) "Sexual conduct", actual or simulated, normal or perverted acts of human
masturbation; deviate sexual intercourse; sexual intercourse; or physical contact with a
person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or the breast of a female in an act
100 of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification or any sadomasochistic abuse or acts including
101 animals or any latent objects in an act of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification;
102 [(21)] (22) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
103 (a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-
104 anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
105 (b) Bestiality;
106 (c) Masturbation;
107 (d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
108 (e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;
109 [(22)] (23) "Sexually oriented business" includes:
110 (a) An adult bookstore or adult video store. "Adult bookstore" or "adult video store"
111 means a commercial establishment which, as one of its principal business activities, offers for
112 sale or rental for any form of consideration any one or more of the following: books,
113 magazines, periodicals, or other printed matter, or photographs, films, motion pictures, video
114 cassettes, compact discs, digital video discs, slides, or other visual representations which are
115 characterized by their emphasis upon the display of specified sexual activities or specified
116 anatomical areas. A principal business activity exists where the commercial establishment:
117 a. Has a substantial portion of its displayed merchandise which consists of such
118 items; or

HB 1702 8
119 b. Has a substantial portion of the wholesale value of its displayed merchandise
120 which consists of such items; or
121 c. Has a substantial portion of the retail value of its displayed merchandise which
122 consists of such items; or
123 d. Derives a substantial portion of its revenues from the sale or rental, for any form of
124 consideration, of such items; or
125 e. Maintains a substantial section of its interior business space for the sale or rental of
126 such items; or
127 f. Maintains an adult arcade. "Adult arcade" means any place to which the public is
128 permitted or invited wherein coin-operated or slug-operated or electronically, electrically, or
129 mechanically controlled still or motion picture machines, projectors, or other image-
130 producing devices are regularly maintained to show images to five or fewer persons per
131 machine at any one time, and where the images so displayed are characterized by their
132 emphasis upon matter exhibiting specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas;
133 (b) An adult cabaret;
134 (c) An adult motion picture theater. "Adult motion picture theater" means a
135 commercial establishment where films, motion pictures, video cassettes, slides, or similar
136 photographic reproductions, which are characterized by their emphasis upon the display of
137 specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas are regularly shown to more than five
138 persons for any form of consideration;
139 (d) A semi-nude model studio. "Semi-nude model studio" means a place where
140 persons regularly appear in a state of semi-nudity for money or any form of consideration in
141 order to be observed, sketched, drawn, painted, sculptured, photographed, or similarly
142 depicted by other persons. Such definition shall not apply to any place where persons
143 appearing in a state of semi-nudity do so in a modeling class operated:
144 a. By a college, junior college, or university supported entirely or partly by taxation;
145 b. By a private college or university which maintains and operates educational
146 programs in which credits are transferable to a college, junior college, or university supported
147 entirely or partly by taxation; or
148 c. In a structure:
149 (i) Which has no sign visible from the exterior of the structure and no other
150 advertising that indicates a semi-nude person is available for viewing; and
151 (ii) Where, in order to participate in a class, a student must enroll at least three days in
152 advance of the class;
153 (e) A sexual encounter center. "Sexual encounter center" means a business or
154 commercial enterprise that, as one of its principal purposes, purports to offer for any form of

HB 1702 9
155 consideration physical contact in the form of wrestling or tumbling between two or more
156 persons when one or more of the persons is semi-nude; or
157 (f) Any business other than an adult cabaret that offers an adult cabaret
158 performance;
159 [(23)] (24) "Sexual performance", any performance, or part thereof, which includes
160 sexual conduct by a child who is less than eighteen years of age;
161 [(24)] (25) "Specified anatomical areas" include:
162 (a) Less than completely and opaquely covered: human genitals, pubic region,
163 buttock, and female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola; and
164 (b) Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely and
165 opaquely covered;
166 [(25)] (26) "Specified sexual activity", includes any of the following:
167 (a) Intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation, or sodomy; or
168 (b) Excretory functions as a part of or in connection with any of the activities
169 described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
170 [(26)] (27) "Substantial", at least thirty percent of the item or items so modified;
171 [(27)] (28) "Visual depiction", includes undeveloped film and videotape, and data
172 stored on computer disk or by electronic means which is capable of conversion into a visual
173 image.
573.520. 1. A person commits the offense of engaging in an adult cabaret
performance if such performance is:
(1) On public property; or
(2) In a location other than an adult cabaret where the adult cabaret
performance is reasonably expected to be viewed by a person who is not an adult.
2. The offense of engaging in an adult cabaret performance is a class A
misdemeanor for a first offense and a class E felony for any second or subsequent
offense.
3. The provisions of this section shall:
(1) Preempt an ordinance or a regulation, restriction, or license that was lawfully
adopted or issued by a political subdivision prior to August 28, 2026, if such ordinance,
regulation, restriction, or license conflicts with this section; and
(2) Prevent or preempt a political subdivision from enacting and enforcing in the
future other ordinances, regulations, restrictions, or licenses that are in conflict with this
section.
✔